Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.335

Reissuance or modification of suspension of license.

(1) Upon application in writing and after hearing pursuant to notice, the board may:

(a) Modify the suspension of, or reissue a license to, an individual whose license has been revoked or suspended; or

(b) Modify the suspension of, or reissue a license to a firm whose license has been revoked, suspended, or which the board has refused to renew.

(2) In the case of suspension for failure to comply with a support order under chapter 74.20A RCW, if the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of a license shall be automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the individual is in compliance with the order.

[ 2022 c 85 s 13; 2001 c 294 s 16; 1997 c 58 s 812; 1992 c 103 s 13; 1986 c 295 s 14; 1983 c 234 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 294: See note following RCW 18.04.015.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.